North Carolina, session 2025, HB1039.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 16 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 16. Compensation and allowances.
The members and officers of the General Assembly shall receive for their services the
compensation and allowances prescribed by law. An increase in the compensation or allowances
of members shall become effective at the beginning of the next regular session of the General
Assembly following the session at which it was enacted. If the General Assembly fails to ratify
by June 30 a comprehensive budget of the anticipated revenue and proposed expenditures of the
State for the ensuing fiscal period, the compensation and allowances of the members of the
General Assembly from July 1 until the earlier of the ratification of the comprehensive budget or
the commencement of the next regular session shall be forfeited."
SECTION 1.(b) The amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on
November 3, 2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to disallow the annual salary and other allowances for
members of the General Assembly if the General Assembly has not passed a budget by June 30
of a year for a period beginning July 1 and continuing until a budget is ratified or the term of the
Legislature ends, whichever occurs first."
SECTION 1.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (b) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of
State shall enroll the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of
votes cast on the question are against the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the
amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 1.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (c) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
*H1039-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the amendment set out in subsection (a)
of this section is effective upon certification.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 1039-First Edition